District of Columbia statutes.
7-2504.05

Revocation of dealer’s license.

A dealer’s license shall be revoked if:

(1)

Any of the criteria in § 7-2504.04 is not currently met;

(2)

The information furnished to the Chief on the application for a dealer’s license proves to be intentionally false;

(3)

There is a violation or omission of the duties, obligations, or requirements imposed by § 7-2504.04; or

(4)

The license holder no longer meets any of the criteria required by this subchapter.

History

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title IV, § 405, 23 DCR 2464
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-372, § 3(k), 56 DCR 1365
Sept. 29, 2012, D.C. Law 19-170, § 2(j), 59 DCR 5691

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2345.
1973 Ed., § 6-1845.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-372, in pars. (1) and (2), deleted “or” at the end; in par. (3), substituted “; or” for a period; and added par. (4).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-170 substituted “subchapter” for “unit” in (4).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(k) of Firearms Registration Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-651, January 6, 2009, 56 DCR 911).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(j) of Firearms Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-352, May 11, 2012, 59 DCR 5116).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(j) of the Firearms Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-394, July 18, 2012, 59 DCR 8694).
For temporary amendment of (4), see § 2(j) of the Firearms Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-510, October 26, 2012, 59 DCR 12808).